District of Columbia statutes.
7-1755

Manufacturer’s data retention and availability requirements.

(a)

A manufacturer shall:

(1)

Retain all data from testing conducted on cigarettes that are offered for sale in the District of Columbia pursuant to this subchapter for 3 years; and

(2)

Make the data available to the Mayor and the Attorney General for the District of Columbia upon written request to verify compliance with the performance standard required by this subchapter.

(b)

Any manufacturer who fails to make copies of these reports available within 60 days of receiving a written request shall be subject to a penalty pursuant to § 7-1756 for each day after the 60th day that the manufacturer does not make the copies available.

May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-157, § 6, 55 DCR 3703